Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.035

Registration required—Hypnotherapists.

A person may not, for a fee or as a part of his or her position as an employee of a state agency, practice hypnotherapy without being registered to practice as a hypnotherapist by the department under this chapter unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040.

[ 2008 c 135 s 3.]